test/src/morphology/Num-kaheksa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against Marit/Maja
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Numeral - kaheksa: # quantifiers '(eng) eight / (fin) kahdeksan' 
    kaheksa+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: kaheksa
    kaheksa+Num+Card+Sg+Gen: kaheksan
    kaheksa+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: kaheksah
    kaheksa+Num+Card+Sg+Ine: kaheksas
    kaheksa+Num+Card+Sg+Abe: kaheksattah
    kaheksa+Num+Card+Sg+Par: kaheksua
    kaheksa+Num+Card+Pl+Nom: kaheksat
    kaheksa+Num+Card+Pl+Gen: kaheksien
    kaheksa+Num+Card+Pl+Ill: kaheksih
    kaheksa+Num+Card+Pl+Ine: kaheksis
    kaheksa+Num+Card+Pl+Abe: kaheksittah
    kaheksa+Num+Card+Pl+Par: kaheksii

    yheksä+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: yheksä
    yheksä+Num+Card+Sg+Gen: yheksän
    yheksä+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: yheksäh
    yheksä+Num+Card+Sg+Ine: yheksäs
    yheksä+Num+Card+Sg+Par: yheksiä
    yheksä+Num+Card+Pl+Nom: yheksät
    yheksä+Num+Card+Pl+Gen: yheksien
    yheksä+Num+Card+Pl+Ill: yheksih
    yheksä+Num+Card+Pl+Ine: yheksis
    yheksä+Num+Card+Pl+Par: yheksii

    nelli+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: nelli
    nelli+Num+Card+Sg+Gen: nellän
    nelli+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: nelläh
    nelli+Num+Card+Sg+Ine: nelläs
    nelli+Num+Card+Sg+Par: nelliä
    nelli+Num+Card+Pl+Nom: nellät
    nelli+Num+Card+Pl+Gen: nellien
    nelli+Num+Card+Pl+Ill: nellih
    nelli+Num+Card+Pl+Ine: nellis
    nelli+Num+Card+Pl+Par: nellii

    tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Nom: tuhat
    tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Gen: tuhanden
    tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ill: tuhandeh
    tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Ine: tuhandes
    tuhat+Num+Card+Sg+Par: tuhattu
